Alaska, session 34, HB361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 41.21.506 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (f) If the commissioner establishes a licensing or comparable procedure for 05 professional fishing guides in regulation under (b)(2) of this section, the license or 06 comparable permit may be revoked only for cause after giving the licensee or 07 comparable permit holder notice of the reason for revocation and an opportunity for 08 hearing. A hearing under this subsection shall be conducted by the office of 09 administrative hearings (AS 44.64.010), and the hearing officer's decision is a final 10 administrative order, subject to judicial review under AS 44.62.560 and 44.62.570. 11 Nothing in this subsection prohibits the commissioner from suspending all licenses or 12 comparable permits that may be issued under (b)(2) of this section. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 44.62.330(a) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 14 (47) Department of Natural Resources, as to revocation of a 15 professional fishing guide's license under AS 41.21.506. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.